Missouri, session 2026, HB2791.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 545, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 545.970, to read as follows:
545.970. A prosecuting attorney shall disclose whether the prosecuting attorney
2 and a codefendant reached a plea agreement in which the prosecuting attorney agreed
3 to either dismiss the codefendant's case or reduce the codefendant's charges in exchange
4 for the codefendant's testimony against another codefendant.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.